Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.176

Examination costs of assault of a child victims—Annual report.

By November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department must submit a report to the legislature and governor with the following information: The number of requests to pay for physical abuse exams for child victims of physical assault pursuant to RCW 7.68.175, how many of these requests are approved and denied including the reasons for denial, how many of the exams are covered for another reason, and any other information the department believes is beneficial.

[ 2022 c 171 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 171: See note following RCW 7.68.175.